Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 2 Administration and Enforcement
3-2-210. Authority of enforcement agent — Deputy Director of Education — Law enforcement officer.

(a)

The right of any enforcement agent, law enforcement officer, or the Deputy Director of Education of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, when duly designated by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division, to enter, inspect records, and seize contraband in or on any licensed premises shall be deemed to be a condition of the license or permit to sell alcoholic beverages granted by this state.

(b)

A duly designated enforcement agent or the deputy director shall have all powers, rights, and protection provided to all other law enforcement officers by the laws of this state, specifically including the power of arrest and service of warrants and the right to bear arms in the line of duty.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, §§ 20, 21; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-1319, 48-1320; Acts 2013, No. 1101, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “agent – Deputy Director of Education – Law enforcement officer” for “agents” in the section heading; in (a), deleted “or” following “enforcement agent”, “search” following “to enter”, and inserted “or the Deputy Director of Education of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division”; and substituted “agent or the deputy director” for “agents” in (b).

3-2-211. Records and reports of licensees.

(a)

Each licensee shall keep complete and accurate records of all alcoholic beverages manufactured, distributed, transported, stored, purchased, or sold within or imported into this state.

(b)

The records shall be of such kind and form and shall be preserved for such period as the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall prescribe. The records shall be accessible for inspection during the regular hours of business by the authorized agents or employees of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division and the authorized law enforcement officers of the respective cities, towns, or counties in which the place of business is located.

(c)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall also have the authority to require the submission of reports by licensees and in such form as he or she may prescribe.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1321.

3-2-212. Denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses — Proceedings before division.

(a)

All proceedings for the suspension and revocation of licenses shall be before the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(b)

The proceedings shall be in accordance with rules established by the director and not inconsistent with law.

(c)

No license shall be revoked except after a hearing by the director with reasonable notice to the licensee and an opportunity to appear and defend.

(d)

However, the director shall not be bound by the legal rules of evidence in conducting hearings and in making his or her decisions and may take into consideration any testimony, papers, or documents which he or she may deem relevant to the issue.

(e)(1)

Whenever the director shall refuse an application for any license or shall suspend or revoke any license, he or she shall prepare an order so providing which shall be signed by the director or some person designated by him or her, and the seal of the director shall be affixed thereto.

(2)

The order shall be mailed by registered mail by the director to the applicant at the address as shown on the application or to the licensee at the address of the premises licensed, as the case may be.

(3)

The order shall be final and binding on all parties until the order has been appealed as provided for in §3-2-213 and a decision has been rendered by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, §§ 13, 14; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-1312, 48-1313; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 38.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

Cross References.

Additional taxes, §3-7-111.

3-2-213. Denial, suspension, or revocation of license — Appeal to board.

(a)(1)

Any applicant or licensee aggrieved by an order of refusal, suspension, or revocation issued by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or any person or group of persons who have formally protested the issuance of any license before a decision has been rendered by the director and are aggrieved by the issuance of the license may appeal the order or decision to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board by filing a notice of appeal.

(2)

The notice of appeal of a director's decision or order shall be in a written form which shall be mailed or delivered to the offices of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(3)

The notice of appeal must be mailed or delivered to the offices of the division within fifteen (15) days after the order to be appealed was received by the recipient, as shown by the certified mail return receipt card returned to the division. In the event that the person filing an appeal of the director's decision or order was not sent a certified letter of the same, then the fifteen-day appeal period begins on the date that the director's decision or order was issued.

(4)

Whenever any notice of appeal is filed with the division, the director shall immediately notify the board of that fact.

(b)(1)

A hearing shall be held within at least sixty (60) days after the date of the filing of the notice of appeal unless the person appealing consents to a later hearing.

(2)

Not later than ten (10) days before the time fixed for the hearing, the director shall notify the board and the applicant, licensee, or protester of the time when and the place where the appeal shall be heard by the board.

(3)

At the time and place so fixed for the hearing, the board shall proceed to hear the appeal.

(4)

At any such hearing the applicant, licensee, or protester, and the director may be present in person or by agent or counsel and present evidence and argument.

(5)

The board shall adopt such rules as it shall deem necessary to govern the procedure in the hearing, and the board shall not be bound by the legal rules of evidence in hearing appeals and in making its determination.

(c)(1)

Within five (5) days after the hearing is concluded, the board shall render its written opinion, decision, or order on the appeal.

(2)

A copy of the opinion, decision, or order shall be mailed by the division by certified mail to the applicant, licensee, or protester.

(3)

The order and decision shall be final and binding on the director and the applicant, licensee, or protester.

(4)

However, an appeal may be taken from any order suspending or revoking a license as provided for in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1314; Acts 1995, No. 652, §§ 1-5; 2005, No. 1193, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 39.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “sixty (60)” for “thirty (30)” in (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “such rules” in (b)(5).

3-2-214. Denial, suspension, or revocation of license — Review by board on own motion.

(a)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board is authorized on its own motion to review any action of the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division in granting or failing to grant, renewing or failing to renew, revoking or suspending, or failing to revoke or suspend upon complaint, any permit and, upon review, to set aside any action of the director in any of these respects.

(b)

Any action by the director in any of these respects shall not become effective until the day following the next meeting of the board following the action by the director, and then only if the board fails to make a motion to exercise its right of review.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 109, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1314.1.

3-2-215. Conduct of hearings before board.

(a)

For the purpose of hearing or conducting any appeal authorized to be heard by it, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall have power:

(1)

To examine or cause to be examined, under oath, any licensee, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Enforcement Division, or any other person and to examine or cause to be examined the books and records of any such licensee;

(2)

To hear testimony and to take proof material for its information in hearing an appeal;

(3)

To administer or cause to be administered oaths; and

(4)

To issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of records for any such purposes.

(b)

The subpoenas shall be effective in any part of this state. Any circuit court may by order duly entered require the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant records subpoenaed by the board, and the court may compel obedience to its orders by proceedings for contempt.

(c)

An applicant involved in a hearing before the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or the board shall be entitled on request to subpoena for the compulsory attendance of witnesses desired by him or her.

(d)(1)

All witnesses shall be entitled to mileage and fees as are prescribed by law for witnesses in the circuit courts of the state.

(2)

The mileage and fees of witnesses subpoenaed at the request of an applicant shall be paid by him or her.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1315.

3-2-216. Appeal to courts.

An appeal of the decision of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board may be filed in conformance with the provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1316; Acts 1995, No. 652, § 6.

3-2-217. Transcript fees.

(a)

There is fixed a cost of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per page for each original page of transcript of record of proceedings had before the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, pertaining to an application for the manufacture, selling, or dispensing of alcoholic beverages, or from a hearing of a violation against a permit which is appealed to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, and for each page of original transcript where an appeal is taken from any decision of the board to a circuit court.

(b)

The fee as provided for herein shall be paid to the director by the person taking the appeal upon completion of the transcript, and the moneys shall be deposited into the general revenues of the State of Arkansas.

(c)

All copies of the original transcript shall cost forty cents (40¢) per page, and the sums shall be collected and deposited as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 790, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1315.1.

Subchapter 3

— Other Enforcing Agencies

Cross References.

Arrest by railroad conductor for drunkenness, §23-12-708.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 132, § 11: Mar. 19, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “It is declared to be a fact that the enforcement of all liquor laws has broken down in this state; that circuit judges are handicapped in enforcing the law as it now stands and that it is necessary that the circuit judges be armed with additional powers for enforcing said laws and held responsible for the results. It is further declared to be a fact that the use of the highways by persons incompetent to drive motor vechicles constitutes a great hazard.

“Now, therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act is found to be necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, and it shall go into effect immediately after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 2: Jan. 1, 2005, by its own terms.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-2-301. Circuit judges — Appointment of temporary officers and special prosecutors.

(a)

The circuit judges of this state are declared to be primarily responsible for the enforcement of laws against the unlawful manufacture and sale of intoxicating liquors.

(b)(1)

Circuit judges are given authority to appoint an officer of the court in lieu of the sheriff to act temporarily and in cases specially designated in the enforcing of any of the laws when the circuit judge becomes convinced that the sheriff is for any cause neglecting his or her duties under the law imposed upon him or her.

(2)

The compensation and expenses of such temporary officer shall be fixed by the judge making the appointment and shall be ordered paid by the judge out of an appropriation hereafter made. A certified copy of the judgment of the court fixing the compensation and expenses shall be sufficient authority for the Auditor of State to draw a voucher in payment of the compensation and expenses and of the Treasurer of State to pay a warrant when presented. The voucher shall be preaudited as other claims against the state.

(c)(1)

Whenever the circuit judge becomes convinced that any prosecuting attorney is not performing his or her full duty with respect to the enforcement of the laws against the unlawful manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquors, he or she shall have authority to appoint a special prosecutor who shall be an attorney learned in the law and with at least ten (10) years' experience in the actual practice of law.

(2)

The special prosecutor shall proceed to investigate and prosecute such cases as may be called to his or her attention by the circuit judge.

(3)

The compensation and expenses of the special prosecutor shall be fixed by the circuit court and paid out of the fund hereafter appropriated. The order of the circuit judge fixing the compensation and expenses of the special prosecutor shall be sufficient authority upon which the Auditor of State may issue a voucher in payment thereof and of the Treasurer of State to pay a warrant when presented. The voucher shall be preaudited as other claims against the state.

(d)

The temporary appointees in place of the sheriffs and the special prosecutors shall have all of the powers and authorities designated by law in the persons whom they are appointed to succeed.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 132, §§ 2-4; Pope's Dig., §§ 14237-14239; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-1102 — 48-1104.

3-2-302. Circuit judges — Impeachment.

(a)

If the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall report to the Governor that any circuit judge is not doing his or her duty with respect to the enforcement of the laws against the unlawful manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquors, and when the report is supported by competent evidence, the Governor may call the General Assembly into extra session to impeach the judge.

(b)

It is declared to be an impeachable offense for any circuit judge to fail to exercise all of the powers of his or her office or the powers granted to him or her under §3-2-301 to enforce the laws.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 132, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 14240; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1105.

3-2-303. Authority of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

(a)

In addition to the duties otherwise prescribed by law upon the Division of Arkansas State Police, it shall be the duty of the division to assist in enforcing all of the laws of the State of Arkansas against the unlawful manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquors.

(b)(1)

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Deputy Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police, captains, lieutenants, rangers, and other employees of the director shall perform such duties as may be prescribed by the director with respect to the enforcement of the laws, and they shall have authority to take affidavits and to swear the persons signing the affidavits with respect to the violation of any law.

(2)

The false swearing or making of the affidavits shall be deemed and punished as perjury.

(c)(1)

The director, deputy director, captains, lieutenants, and rangers shall have all of the authority now vested in sheriffs and police officers to search for and seize intoxicating liquors unlawfully held in this state.

(2)

They shall also have the same authority to make arrests for the violation of such laws and to serve any and all kinds of criminal process issued by any of the courts in this state in connection with the enforcement of such laws.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 132, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 14236; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1101; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5734.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a) and twice in (b)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a).

3-2-304. Search warrants.

(a)

It is made and declared to be the duty of a circuit, district, and city court on information given, on its own knowledge, or when it has reasonable grounds to believe that alcohol, spirituous, ardent, vinous, malt, or fermented liquors, or any compound or preparation thereof commonly called tonics, bitters, or medicated liquors of any kind are kept in any prohibited district to be sold contrary to law or have been shipped into any prohibited district to be sold contrary to law, that it issue a warrant directed to some peace officer, directing in the warrant a search for intoxicating liquors and specifying in the warrant the place to be searched.

(b)

However, this section shall not apply to the giving away or selling of native wines when the sale is authorized by law.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 13, § 1, p. 11; C. & M. Dig., § 6184; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1107; Acts 2003, No. 1185, §§ 1, 2.

Cross References.

Seizure and forfeiture of spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors or beverages, §§3-3-311 —3-3-315.

Subchapter 4

— Distribution

Effective Dates.

Acts 2007, No. 668, § 6: Mar. 29, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that lawsuits are currently pending in both Federal Court for the Eastern District of Arkansas and Pulaski County Circuit Court regarding the constitutionality of the laws being amended by this subchapter; that the lawsuits are being defended by the office of the Arkansas Attorney General; and that immediate implementation of this act is necessary because any delay may result in substantial costs to the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1105, § 4: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that a supplier of an alcoholic beverage is not required to file an application with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division each calendar year; that suppliers should be required to register with the division each calendar year; and that the division's yearly registration period begins on April 1. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-2-401. Purpose.

This subchapter is promulgated pursuant to the authority granted to the State of Arkansas pursuant to the provisions of the Twenty-First Amendment to the United States Constitution specifically for the following purposes:

(1)

To prevent unfair business practices, discrimination, and undue control of such wholesalers by distillers, manufacturers, importers, and producers;

(2)

To maintain stability and healthy competition in the alcoholic beverage industry;

(3)

To promote and maintain a sound and stable system of distribution of alcoholic beverages; and

(4)

To promote the public health, safety, and welfare.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 1.

3-2-402. Scope of subchapter.

This subchapter does not repeal or supersede any of the provisions of §3-5-1101 et seq. and to the extent of any conflict, the provisions of §3-5-1101 et seq. shall prevail.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 11.

3-2-403. Spirituous and vinous beverages — Registration of brands and labels — Designation of licensed wholesaler — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “brand label” means the label carrying the distinctive design of a brand name of a spirituous liquor or vinous liquor.

(b)(1)

Every manufacturer, importer, or producer of spirituous and vinous beverages, as defined by §3-1-102, doing business in the State of Arkansas shall submit to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division one (1) Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau Certificate of Label Approval for each brand of spirituous and vinous beverages and the brand label extension of each brand of spirituous and vinous beverages to be shipped for the first time by the shipper into or within the state and shall designate in the application for registration one (1) licensed liquor wholesaler in the state, who shall be the exclusive distributor of such brand or label within the state. Such designated wholesaler shall be initially approved by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and shall not be changed or initially disapproved except for good cause, and the director shall determine good cause after a hearing pursuant to the provisions set out in this subchapter. Any brands or labels previously registered in this state and which have subsequently been withdrawn from distribution in this state shall be treated in the same manner as the initial registration of brands or labels and are subject to the provisions of this section.

(2)

A brand label and a brand label extension shall be registered by the supplier before the first shipment of each brand label and brand label extension into or within the state on or after July 1, 2013.

(c)

A copy of the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau Certificate of Label Approval for each brand label and brand label extension shall be submitted with the registration of each brand label and brand label extension.

(d)

The registration of a brand label and a brand label extension shall:

(1)

Be in writing or electronically submitted as prescribed by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;

(2)

Be verified if it is submitted in writing; and

(3)

Set forth information as the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division requires.

(e)

Each Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau Certificate of Label Approval submitted for registration shall be accompanied by a registration fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) payable by check, cash, money order, or electronic payment.

(f)

The registration shall be renewed annually.

(g)

The division shall promulgate rules to administer and implement this section.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 2; 2013, No. 1105, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted (a); in (b)(1), designated subdivision, substituted “Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau Certificate of Label Approval” for “label” and inserted “and the brand label extension of each brand of spirituous and vinous beverages”; and inserted (b)(2) and (c) through (g).

3-2-404. Request to change wholesalers — Contents of application.

Any distiller, manufacturer, importer, or producer desiring to change wholesalers with respect to any brand shall file with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division a wholesaler change request containing the following information as applicable:

(1)

The name of each brand involved;

(2)

The case volume in Arkansas for each brand for the current year or portion thereof and the two (2) previous calendar years;

(3)

The name of the wholesaler currently distributing such brand;

(4)

The name of the proposed new wholesaler; and

(5)(A)

A detailed explanation of the specific business reasons for the request to change wholesalers.

(B)

Business reasons which may be considered by the director in determining good cause for authorizing a change of wholesalers will include:

(i)

A wholesaler's bankruptcy or serious financial instability, including its consistent failure to pay its debts as they fall due or its failure to meet or maintain any objective standards of capitalization expressly agreed to between the wholesaler and the distiller, manufacturer, importer, or producer, provided such standards are determined by the director to be commercially reasonable;

(ii)

A wholesaler's repeated violations of any provision of federal or state law, rule, or regulation, whether or not such violations resulted in official action;

(iii)

A wholesaler's failure to maintain reasonable sales volume of the brand, taking into consideration such factors as the extent of the distiller's, manufacturer's, importer's, or producer's advertising and promotion of the particular brand, prevailing economic conditions affecting sales generally, or the extent of the wholesaler's efforts, or lack thereof, to promote a particular brand; and

(iv)

Any other factors relevant to such proposed change and which aid the director in determining good cause.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 40.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “federal or state law, rule, or regulation” for “federal or state law or regulations” in (5)(B)(ii).

3-2-405. Request to change wholesalers — Notice — Objections — Hearing — Disposition of proceedings.

(a)(1)

At the same time that the original wholesaler change request is filed with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, a copy thereof shall be mailed by the distiller, manufacturer, importer, or producer to each wholesaler who may be affected by the proposed changes. Immediately upon receipt of any wholesaler change request, the director shall notify the currently designated wholesaler of the request by certified mail.

(2)

Within fifteen (15) days after receipt of such notice by the affected wholesaler, any such wholesaler or party required to be given notice by this subchapter may interpose written objections thereto. Such written objections shall be filed in the office of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, and copies thereof shall be served by the objecting party upon the party proposing the change and upon all wholesalers who may be affected by the proposed change.

(b)

Upon the receipt of an objection from any party, or upon his or her own motion, the director shall hold a hearing, after providing due notice to all parties concerned, for the purpose of determining the truth of any matters of fact alleged by any party and determining whether the proposed changes are based upon sufficient cause and are otherwise consistent with the policies set out in §3-2-401. If it is determined from the evidence educed at said hearing that the brand or label involved is the same as, or similar to, or is such a modification of, substitution of, upgrade of, or extension of a brand or label which has already been registered by the distiller, manufacturer, importer, or producer, so as to render it unjust or inequitable, without cause being shown, to designate the brand or label to a wholesaler different from the wholesaler designated for the brand or label being so modified, substituted, upgraded, or extended, then such request shall be denied; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed or prevent the distiller, manufacturer, importer, or producer from treating the matter as a desire to change wholesalers and from proceeding under the provisions of §3-2-404, either before or after such determination.

(c)

No proposed change will be approved by the director which is based upon the failure or refusal of a wholesaler to comply with any demand or request of a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or producer if such demand or request would result in a violation of any provision of federal or state law or regulation. During such fifteen-day objection period or until the proposed changes have been finally approved by the director, the party proposing the change shall continue to supply the designated wholesaler, upon commercially reasonable terms, such reasonable quantities of the brand involved as the wholesaler may require. If, at any time, the director finds a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or producer is not shipping the wholesaler a reasonable amount of merchandise, he or she may withdraw approval of all brands registered by such parties within the state.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 4.

3-2-406. Request to change wholesalers — Hearing — Time — Findings — Appeal.

(a)

Any hearing held by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division pursuant to the provisions of §3-2-405 shall be held within thirty (30) days after the receipt of any notice of objection to a wholesaler change request.

(b)

The findings of the director made after such hearing shall be presented to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board at its next regularly scheduled meeting.

(c)

Any aggrieved party may appeal the decision of the director to the full board to be heard de novo and any such appeal hearing will be scheduled and held pursuant to hearing procedures established for the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division by state law and division rules.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 41.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

3-2-407. Request to change wholesalers — Automatic approval.

If no objection is filed to the wholesaler change request as provided in §3-2-406, the proposed changes shall stand automatically approved by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division at the expiration of such fifteen-day period, conditioned upon the manufacturer's or importer's repurchasing all inventory of the subject brand from the previously designated wholesaler at such wholesaler's laid-in cost.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 6.

3-2-408. Acquisition of right to sell, ship, or distribute label.

Any distiller, manufacturer, importer, or producer who obtains or acquires in any manner the right to sell, ship, or distribute any label shall for the purpose of this subchapter stand in place of and be subject to all rights, privileges, and duties and obligations of its predecessor or its predecessors from whom such brands or labels were obtained or acquired.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 7.

3-2-409. Beer, malt products, or light wine.

(a)

Every manufacturer or importer of beer or other malt products or light wine doing business in the State of Arkansas shall submit to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division one (1) label for each brand of beer or malt product or light wine to be shipped for the first time into or within the state and shall designate within the application for registration any number of wholesalers in the state, each of whom shall be the exclusive distributor of such brand within the geographical territory assigned by the manufacturer or importer to such wholesaler.

(b)

Transfers of brands of malt products or light wine or changes in geographical distribution areas assigned shall not be subject to the provisions set out above for spirituous or vinous products so long as any such manufacturer or importer has complied with the filing provisions of applicable law.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 8.

3-2-410. Terms and conditions of agreements with wholesaler binding on successor.

A successor to a distiller, manufacturer, importer, producer, winery, or brewer of beer, malt liquor, light wine, wine, or liquor that continues in business as a distiller, manufacturer, importer, producer, winery, or brewery or that continues to operate under the names of any product acquired by said distiller, manufacturer, importer, producer, winery, or brewer shall be bound by all terms and conditions of any agreements with any Arkansas wholesaler, whether oral or written, of the distiller, manufacturer, importer, producer, winery, or brewery which are in effect on the date of succession.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 10.

3-2-411. Subchapter incorporated into division approvals — Applicability — Waiver.

(a)

The terms, conditions, and requirements of this subchapter are hereby expressly made a part of the terms of and as conditions to the approval granted by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to distillers, manufacturers, importers, or producers to do business in the state and by the application for, the acceptance of, or the conduct of business under any such approval, a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or producer consents and agrees to comply with the terms, conditions, and requirements of this subchapter.

(b)

This subchapter does not apply to manufacturers or wholesalers of small farm winery wines. For the purpose of this section, “small farm winery” has the same meaning as defined by §3-5-1601.

(c)

No right, duty, or other provision set out in this subchapter may be waived by any agreement or contract between any wholesaler and supplier regardless of whether any such waiver agreement was made prior to or after July 15, 1991.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, §§ 12, 13; 2007, No. 668, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment, in (b), substituted “small farm winery wines” for Arkansas native wine” and added the last sentence.

3-2-412. Dual distributorship prohibited — Definition.

(a)(1)

The creation of a dual distributorship is prohibited.

(2)

An unlawful dual distributorship is created whenever any manufacturer designates as its distributor more than one (1) Arkansas liquor wholesaler in the state or wholesale beer permit holder to distribute the same brand of alcoholic beverage in the same geographical territory, whether a city, a county, counties, or the state.

(b)

In addition to any remedies to any aggrieved party authorized by law, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may withdraw approval of any and all brands registered by any manufacturer found to be in violation of this subchapter, such findings to be made after a hearing pursuant to hearing procedures established for the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division by state law and administrative rules.

(c)(1)

For the purposes of this subchapter, a “brand” means the same product or substantially the same product as evidenced by the product label that must be filed with the division.

(2)

Identical or substantially identical labels will be considered and treated as the same brand.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 260, § 9; 2019, No. 315, § 42.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

3-2-413. Labels for confectionaries containing nonliquid alcohol.

A confectionary containing between five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) and five percent (5%) by volume of alcohol shall bear a label stating: “This product contains up to 5% alcohol by volume”.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1035, § 2.